Maine, session 132, LD1528.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §164, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Funding. A separate nonlapsing, interest-bearing account, administered by the
department, is established in the department within the Bureau of Agriculture, Food and
Rural Resources to support public-private partnerships to carry out the purposes of the
program. The account consists of money appropriated or allocated to it by the Legislature
or received from any private or public source.
Sec. 2. Transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before
June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer $1,000,000 from the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund to the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry,
Bureau of Agriculture, Food and Rural Resources, Maine Working Farmland Access and
Protection Program established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 7, section 164 for
funding to support farmland conservation efforts.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides funding for farmland conservation efforts under the Maine Working
Farmland Access and Protection Program established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
7, section 164.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,000,000 $0
2251 Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Establishes one Resource Management Coordinator position and provides
funding for associated All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $114,286 $120,766
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,786 $124,266
3248 DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Establishes one Resource Management Coordinator position and provides
funding for associated All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,292 $3,292
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,292 $3,292
4317
Page 1 - 132LR1689(01)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $647 $647
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $647 $647

AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND
FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $121,078 $127,558
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,000,647 $647
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,121,725 $128,205